Utah statutes.
10-7-80.   Development committee -- Appointment of members -- Terms, compensation and expenses, vacancies and removal of members.

The board of city commissioners or council of any city within the state is hereby authorized and empowered to appoint by resolution an unpaid commission of three or more members, to be known as the city resource development committee. One or more members of the board of city commissioners or council shall be designated by the board of city commissioners or council as members of such committee. Each of the other members of the committee shall be a resident of the city. The term of appointed members of the committee shall be two years and until their respective successors have been appointed. The members of the committee shall serve as such without compensation, except that the board of city commissioners or council may provide for reimbursement of the members of the committee for actual expenses incurred, upon presentation of proper receipts and vouchers. The board of city commissioners or council shall provide for the filling of vacancies in the membership of the committee and for the removal of a member for nonperformance of duty or misconduct.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1965 General Session

